Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 11
HEALTH CARE COST SAVINGS ACT

25.5-11-101 to 25.5-11-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1176), ch. 381, p. 3424, § 2, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

Section 25.5-11-106 provided for the repeal of this article, effective September 1, 2022. (See L. 2019, p. 3428.)